District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.222

Service by members of abolished boards.

Members of boards abolished by this subchapter shall serve as members of the successor boards to which their functions are transferred until the expiration of their terms or the appointment of their successors, whichever occurs first. In any case where there is no successor board, or where the activities of two or more boards have been combined, or where more than one member of a prior board or board is eligible for a single seat on a new board, the Mayor shall make the determination as to which member of the former board or board, if any, shall be seated on a new board. The determination of the Mayor shall be final and shall not be reviewable in any court.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.222.